Hawaii, session 2026, SB1622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that artificial intelligence technologies are rapidly transforming industries and societies worldwide by enabling computers and machines to simulate human learning, comprehension, problem solving, decision making, creativity, and autonomy.  Therefore, establishing an artificial intelligence institute in Hawaii will: (1)  Promote research and innovation in artificial intelligence tailored to Hawaii's unique cultural, economic, and environmental needs; (2)  Advance workforce development and education to prepare residents for the artificial intelligence-driven future; (3)  Foster public-private partnerships to leverage resources and drive economic growth; (4)  Ensure that artificial intelligence development aligns with ethical principles and benefits for all residents of Hawaii; and (5)  Provide access to advanced computing infrastructure, artificial intelligence and data science expertise, immersive visualization technologies, and collaborative workspaces to support research, education, and creative projects. The legislature further finds that as the sole institution of public higher education in the State, the university of Hawaii has the unique capacity to draw upon its academic disciplines, research strengths, and professional programs to serve as the hub for Hawaii artificial intelligence development in areas such as renewable energy, climate resilience, space sciences and engineering, health, sustainable agriculture, additive manufacturing, creative media, and cultural preservation. The legislature also finds that activities of the artificial intelligence institute could take place, in part, at the several campuses and academic and professional programs across the university of Hawaii system.  In turn, faculty associated with the artificial intelligence institute could actively contribute to its vision by participating in interdisciplinary research, community engagement, and student mentoring and securing grants that align with the institute's mission and the State's economic roadmap.  Through this mutual commitment, the artificial intelligence institute could serve as a model of excellence for regional, place-based innovation, workforce development, knowledge creation, cultural enrichment, and social good to serve Hawaii and the nation. Additionally, due to artificial intelligence's importance to the State, funding an institute dedicated to research, governance and ethics, development, and applications of artificial intelligence and related technologies is in the public interest and a matter of statewide concern. The purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for an artificial intelligence institute within the university of Hawaii to develop, support, and advance artificial intelligence initiatives statewide. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  aloha intelligence institute §304A-     Aloha intelligence institute; artificial intelligence; established.  (a)  There is established the aloha intelligence institute under the office of the vice president for research and innovation at the university of Hawaii. (b)  The institute shall: (1)  Facilitate interdisciplinary research and development in artificial intelligence with a focus on areas relevant to Hawaii, including but not limited to: (A)  Climate resilience and disaster management; (B)  Sustainable agriculture, food security, and marine resource management; (C)  Health care advancements and equitable delivery of patient care; (D)  Renewable energy optimization; (E)  Creative media and other emerging industries; (F)  Advanced manufacturing and rapid prototyping; and (G)  Cultural and linguistic preservation; (2)  Foster training and education programs, including but not limited to: (A)  Artificial intelligence-related undergraduate and graduate degree programs; (B)  Artificial intelligence-related training for university faculty and staff; (C)  Workforce development initiatives; (D)  Community outreach and K-12 educational programs; and (E)  Creation of student pathways in artificial intelligence-related fields that align with efforts from the department of education; (3)  Partner with public and private entities to promote innovation, entrepreneurship, and job creation in artificial intelligence-related fields; and (4)  Develop ethical guidelines and policies for the use of artificial intelligence in Hawaii. (c)  The institute shall be led by a director, who shall convene an advisory board consisting of the following members: (1)  Representatives from across the university of Hawaii system and other academic institutions; (2)  Representatives from relevant state agencies; (3)  Global, national, and local leaders from technology, business, and nonprofit sectors; and (4)  Community leaders, including Native Hawaiian and cultural experts. (d)  Aside from general funding from the legislature, the institute may seek additional funding through federal research grants, partnerships with private sector organizations, and philanthropic contributions. (e)  The institute shall submit a biannual report to the legislature and the governor.  The report shall include: (1)  A summary of activities and achievements; (2)  Financial statements and funding updates; and (3)  Recommendations for future initiatives and funding needs." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to establish faculty of practice and administrative professional technical positions within the aloha intelligence institute and to develop, support, and advance artificial intelligence initiatives statewide pursuant to section 304A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes, as follows: (1)  $1,500,000 for ten full-time equivalent (10.0 FTE) permanent positions; and (2)  $500,000 for seven full-time equivalent (7.0 FTE) non-recurring positions and start-up expenses. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish faculty of practice and administrative professional technical positions within the aloha intelligence institute and to develop, support, and advance artificial intelligence initiatives statewide pursuant to section 304A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes, as follows: (1)  $1,500,000 for ten full-time equivalent (10.0 FTE) permanent positions; and (2)  $500,000 for non-recurring start-up expenses. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________